Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 51. Offenses Against the Family and Vulnerable Adults.

Cross references. —

For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.

Collateral references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d, Bigamy, § 1 et seq.

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Infants, §§ 16-23.

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Juvenile Courts, etc., §§ 129-137.

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parent and Child, §§ 45, 51-72.

10 C.J.S., Bigamy, § 1 et seq.

43 C.J.S., Infants, §§ 10, 23, 96

67A C.J.S., Parent and Child, §§ 38, 156-161.